Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.738

Down syndrome resources—Development.

(1)(a) The department shall develop the following resources regarding Down syndrome:

(i) Up-to-date, evidence-based, written information about Down syndrome and people born with Down syndrome that has been reviewed by medical experts and national Down syndrome organizations; and

(ii) Contact information regarding support services, including information hotlines specific to Down syndrome, resource centers or clearinghouses, national and local Down syndrome organizations, and other education and support programs.

(b) The resources prepared by the department must:

(i) Be culturally and linguistically appropriate for expectant parents receiving a positive prenatal diagnosis or for the parents of a child receiving a postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome; and

(ii) Include: Physical, developmental, educational, and psychosocial outcomes; life expectancy; clinical course; and intellectual and functional development and therapy options.

(2) The department shall make the information described in this section available to any person who renders prenatal care, postnatal care, or genetic counseling to expectant parents receiving a positive prenatal diagnosis or to the parents of a child receiving a postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "Down syndrome" means a chromosomal condition that results in the presence of an extra whole or partial copy of chromosome 21.

[ 2016 c 70 s 1.]